Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.320

Eminent domain.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to acquire by purchase and condemnation all lands and property rights, both within and without the metropolitan area, which are necessary for its purposes. Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the metropolitan council in the same manner and by the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for cities, except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 240 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.320. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 32.]

NOTES:

Eminent domain by cities: Chapter 8.12 RCW.